roh.twol
Alphabet 
	b d ḍ f g h j k l m n p r ṛ s š t ṭ v w y z
	a ã á e ẽ é i ĩ í o õ ó u ũ ú
	
	%{g%}:g %{g%}:0 %{y%}:y %{y%}:0 %{o%}:o %{o%}:0
	
	a:0 e:0
	
	%{w%}:g %{w%}:w
;

Sets
Vowels = a ã á e ẽ é i ĩ í o õ ó u ũ ú ;
Consonants = b d ḍ f g h j k l m n p r ṛ s š t ṭ v w y z ;

Rules
! Nouns--------------------------------------
"insertion of g after vowels and r" ! definite suffixes
%{g%}:g <=> Vowels: _ a n ; ! before -an
	Vowels: _ u n ; ! before -un
	r: _ ; ! before all definite suffixes (-wa, -an, -un)

"gemination on noun stems with definite suffix" ! for definite suffixes -wa, -un, -an
%{g%}:Cx <=> Cy _ ;
	where	Cy in (b d ḍ f g h j k l m n p ṛ s š t ṭ v w y z)
			Cx in (b d ḍ f g h j k l m n p ṛ s š t ṭ v w y z)
	matched ;

"insertion of y between vowels" ! erg/instr suffixes
%{y%}:y <=> Vowels: _ ;

"drop y after consonants" ! erg/instr suffixes
%{y%}:0 <=> Consonants: _ ;

"insertion of o after consonants" ! gen/dat/abl/loc/ben suffixes
%{o%}:o <=> Consonants: _ ;

"drop o after vowels" ! gen/dat/abl/loc/ben suffixes
%{o%}:0 <=> Vowels: _ ;

! Verbs--------------------------------------
"coalescence of a + o to o"
a:0 <=> _ o ;

"coalescence of a + e to a"
e:0 <=>	a _ ;

! Numerals-----------------------------------
"gemination on numerals in noun class 2"
%{w%}:Cx <=> Cy _ ;
	where	Cy in (k n z t š)
			Cx in (k n z t š)
	matched ;

"g after r" ! occurs with sair 'four'
%{w%}:g <=> r _ ;

"w after vowels" ! exception with dui 'two'
%{w%}:w <=> Vowels: _ a n ;
